Utah statutes.
53A-8a-804.   Creation -- Make-up -- Duties of a district PAR Joint Panel.

(1)  A district that receives money to create a PAR Program under Section 53A-8a-802 shall create a PAR Joint Panel consisting of an equal number of teacher representatives and district administrators or their designees.

(2)  A district PAR Joint Panel shall:

(a)  meet regularly to design the district's PAR Program;

(b)  review cases of teachers assigned to the district's PAR Program and decide whether the district should continue to employ teachers based on evidence collected by consulting teachers; and

(c)  select consulting teachers through a competitive process.



Enacted by Chapter 273, 2012 General Session

